Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
448

DENTISTRY

Section

448-1 Dentistry defined; exempted practices

448-1.5 Lead apron during x-ray; required

448-2 Practice without license prohibited

448-3 Practice by unlicensed employee
prohibited; penalty

448-4 Fraudulent advertising

448-5 Board of examiners; appointment

448-6 Powers and duties, meetings

448-7 Fees

448-8 Repealed

448-8.5 Continuing education requirements

448-9 Application for licensure

448-9.4 American Board of Dental Examiners (ADEX)
examination;

regional examinations

448-9.5 Repealed

448-9.6 Community service license

448-10 Repealed

448-11 Investigations and hearings

448-12 Temporary license

448-13 Certificate, evidence

448-14 Repealed

448-14.5 Prohibition on ownership and interference

448-15 No corporation to practice dentistry;
penalty

448-16 Duty to furnish names, etc.

448-16.5 Board of dental examiners; summary
suspension

448-17 Refusal, revocation, suspension, and
administrative

penalties

448-18 Hearings

448-19 Using assumed name or degree prohibited

448-20 Practicing for advertising purposes,
penalty

448-21 Criminal penalties

448-22 Prosecuting officers, duty

448-23 Filing of false information; revocation of
license

448-24 Remedies or penalties cumulative

448-26 Discipline based on action taken by
another state or

federal agency; conditions; prohibition on
practice

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Dental health facilities; health care facilities; use of
latex gloves, see §321-11.9.

Dental service corporations, see chapter 423.

Health care peer review, see chapter 671D.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next